Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.160

Costs to judgment creditor.

The judge may make an order allowing to the judgment creditor a fixed sum as costs, consisting of his or her witness fees and referee's fees and other disbursements, and of a sum in addition thereto not exceeding twenty-five dollars, and directing the payment thereof out of any money which has come or may come to the hands of the receiver or of the sheriff within a time specified in the order.

[ 2011 c 336 s 158; 1893 c 133 s 16; RRS s 628.]